Utah statutes.
57-1-1.   Definitions.

As used in this title:

(1)  "Certified copy" means a copy of a document certified by its custodian to be a true and correct copy of the document or the copy of the document maintained by the custodian, where the document or copy is maintained under the authority of the United States, the state of Utah or any of its political subdivisions, another state, a court of record, a foreign government, or an Indian tribe.

(2)  "Document" means every instrument in writing, including every conveyance, affecting, purporting to affect, describing, or otherwise concerning any right, title, or interest in real property, except wills and leases for a term not exceeding one year.

(3)  "Real property" or "real estate" means any right, title, estate, or interest in land, including all nonextracted minerals located in, on, or under the land, all buildings, fixtures and improvements on the land, and all water rights, rights-of-way, easements, rents, issues, profits, income, tenements, hereditaments, possessory rights, claims, including mining claims, privileges, and appurtenances belonging to, used, or enjoyed with the land or any part of the land.

(4)  "Stigmatized" means:

(a)  the site or suspected site of a homicide, other felony, or suicide;

(b)  the dwelling place of a person infected, or suspected of being infected, with the Human Immunodeficiency Virus, or any other infectious disease that the Utah Department of Health determines cannot be transferred by occupancy of a dwelling place; or

(c)  property that has been found to be contaminated, and that the local health department has subsequently found to have been decontaminated in accordance with Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 9, Illegal Drug Operations Site Reporting and Decontamination Act.

